Utah statutes.
76-9-108.   Disrupting a funeral or memorial service.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Funeral procession" means a procession of two or more motor vehicles where:

(i)  the operators of the vehicles identify themselves as being part of the procession by having the lamps or lights of the vehicle on and by keeping in close formation with the other vehicles in the procession;

(ii)  at least one vehicle contains the body or remains of a deceased person being memorialized; and

(iii)  the vehicles are going to or from a memorial service.

(b)  "Memorial service" means a wake, funeral, graveside service, burial, or other ceremony or rite held in connection with the burial or cremation of an individual.

(c)  "Memorial site" means a church, synagogue, mosque, funeral home, mortuary, cemetery, grave site, mausoleum, or other place at which a memorial service is conducted.

(d)  "Disruptive activity" means:

(i)  a loud or disruptive oration or speech that is not part of the memorial service;

(ii)  the display of a placard, banner, poster, flag, or other item that is not part of the memorial service; or

(iii)  the distribution of any handbill, pamphlet, leaflet, or other written material or other item that is not part of the memorial service.

(2)  A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if the person, with intent to disrupt the memorial service, does any of the following during the period beginning 60 minutes immediately before the scheduled commencement of a memorial service and ending 60 minutes after the conclusion of a memorial service:

(a)  obstructs, hinders, impedes, or blocks another person's entry to or exit from the memorial site;

(b)  obstructs, hinders, impedes, or blocks a funeral procession;

(c)  makes unreasonable noise; or

(d)  engages in a disruptive activity within 200 feet of the memorial service.



Enacted by Chapter 46, 2007 General Session

